Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.546

Petition for review—Contents.

A petition for review must set forth:

(1) The name and mailing address of the petitioner;

(2) The name and mailing address of the petitioner's attorney, if any;

(3) The name and mailing address of the agency whose action is at issue;

(4) Identification of the agency action at issue, together with a duplicate copy, summary, or brief description of the agency action;

(5) Identification of persons who were parties in any adjudicative proceedings that led to the agency action;

(6) Facts to demonstrate that the petitioner is entitled to obtain judicial review;

(7) The petitioner's reasons for believing that relief should be granted; and

(8) A request for relief, specifying the type and extent of relief requested.

[ 1988 c 288 s 510.]